Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1691.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 401(f) of the act of December 5, 1936 (2nd Sp.Sess., 1937 P.L.2897, No.1), known as the Unemployment Compensation Law, is amended to read:Section 401. Qualifications Required to Secure Compensation.--Compensation shall be payable to any employe who is or becomes unemployed, and who--12345678910111213141516171819202122232425 * * *(f) Has worked ten (10) credit weeks and has earned, subsequent to his separation from work under circumstances which are disqualifying under the provisions of subsections 402(b), 402(e), 402(e.1), 402(h) and 402(k) of this act, remuneration for services in an amount equal to or in excess of [six (6)] fifteen (15) times his weekly benefit rate in "employment" as defined in this act. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to a suspension of work by an individual pursuant to a leave of absence granted by his last employer, provided such individual has made a reasonable effort to return to work with such employer upon the expiration of his leave of absence.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in six months.20250HB1691PN2076 - 2 - 1234567891011121314